Washington statutes.
RCW 35.86.020

Financing.

In order to provide for off-street parking space and/or facilities, such cities are authorized, in addition to the powers already possessed by them for financing public improvements, to finance their acquisition and construction through the issuance and sale of revenue bonds or general obligation bonds or both. Any bonds issued by such cities pursuant to this section shall be issued in the manner and within the limitations prescribed by the Constitution and the laws of this state.

In addition local improvement districts may be created and their financing procedures used for this purpose in accordance with the provisions of Title 35 RCW as now or hereafter amended.

Such cities may authorize and finance the economic and physical surveys and plans, acquisition and construction, for off-street parking spaces and facilities, and the maintenance and management of such off-street parking spaces and facilities either within their general budget or by issuing revenue bonds or general obligation bonds or both.

General obligation bonds issued hereunder may additionally be made payable from any otherwise unpledged revenue, fees or charges which may be derived from the ownership, operation, lease or license of off-street parking space or facilities or which may be derived from the license of on-street parking space.

Such cities may, in addition to utilizing the pledging revenues from off-street parking spaces and facilities, utilize and pledge revenues from on-street parking meters in exercising any of the powers provided by this chapter, including the financing of economic and physical surveys and plans, acquisition, and construction, for off-street parking facilities, the maintenance and management thereof, and for the payment of debt service of revenue bonds issued therefor.

In the event revenue bonds are issued, such cities are authorized to make such covenants pertaining to the continued maintenance of on-street and/or off-street parking spaces and facilities and the fixing of rates and charges for the use thereof as are deemed necessary to effectuate the sale of such revenue bonds.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 204 s 14; 1967 ex.s. c 144 s 14; 1965 c 7 s 35.86.020. Prior: 1961 c 186 s 2; 1959 c 302 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 204: See note following RCW 35.86A.010.

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 144: See note following RCW 36.900.030.

Public parks in or beneath off-street parking space or facilities—Revenue bond financing—Special funds—Use of off-street and on-street parking revenues: RCW 35.41.010.